Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21 Health and Safety of Pupils

16-21-1.
Transportation of public and private school pupils.

The school committee of any town or city shall provide suitable transportation, that may include, but is not limited to, pupil transportation vehicles as defined in §

31-22.1-1

, to and from school for pupils attending public and private schools of elementary and high school grades, except private schools that are operated for profit, who reside so far from the public or private school that the pupil attends as to make the pupil’s regular attendance at school impractical and for any pupil whose regular attendance would otherwise be impracticable on account of physical disability or infirmity.

The school committee of any town or city using a pupil transportation vehicle as defined in §

31-22.1-1

shall comply with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, notwithstanding the provisions of §

31-22.1-3(6)

.

For transportation provided to children enrolled in grades kindergarten through five (5), school bus monitors, other than the school bus driver, shall be required on all school-bound and home-bound routes. Variances to the requirement for a school bus monitor may be granted by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education if he or she finds that an alternative plan provides substantially equivalent safety for children. For the purposes of this section a “school bus monitor” means any person sixteen (16) years of age or older.

No school committee shall negotiate, extend, or renew any transportation contract unless such contract enables the district to participate in the statewide transportation system, without penalty to the district, upon implementation of the statewide transportation system described in §§

16-21.1-7

[repealed] and

16-21.1-8

. Notice of the implementation of the statewide transportation system for in-district transportation shall be provided in writing by the department of elementary and secondary education to the superintendent of each district upon implementation. Upon implementation of the statewide system of transportation for all students, each school committee shall purchase transportation services for its own resident students by accessing the statewide system on a fee-for-service basis for each student; provided, however, that any school committee that fulfills its transportation obligations primarily through the use of district-owned buses or district employees may continue to do so. Variances to the requirement for the purchase of transportation services through the statewide transportation system for non-public and non-shared routes may be granted by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education if the commissioner finds that an alternative system is more cost effective. All fees paid for transportation services provided to students under the statewide system shall be paid into a statewide student transportation services restricted receipt account within the department of elementary and secondary education. Payments from the account shall be limited to payments to the transportation service provider and transportation system consultants. This restricted receipt account shall not be subject to the indirect cost recoveries provisions set forth in §

35-4-27

.

No school committee shall negotiate, extend, or renew any school transportation service contract unless the contract provides for payments to school bus drivers, attendants, monitors, and aides for one hundred and eighty (180) days or the length of the contracted-for school year, whichever is longer.

With respect to any contract entered into under this section, a school committee or local education agency shall give a preference in contract and/or subcontract awards to the public transportation provider that uses electric buses to the greatest extent. This preference shall be given equal weight to any other preferences available to vendors.

With respect to any contract entered into under this section, no school committee or local education agency (“LEA”) shall take any adverse disciplinary action against any school bus driver, attendant, monitor, or aide covered by a collective bargaining agreement prior to any investigation or action taken by the contracting entity as provided for in the collective bargaining agreement. Nor shall the school committee or LEA impose discipline in excess of what is provided for in the governing collective bargaining agreement.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 31; P.L. 1925, ch. 587, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2506, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-1

; P.L. 1971, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 526, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 12, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 292, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 293, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-21-1.1.
Student registration for transportation.

The school committee of any city or town or regional school district in this state may maintain a registry of any students who will require busing during the school year.

The students’ parents may register the names and addresses of students with the school district at the start of each school year.

The school district of each city or town or regional school district may use the information in the registry to more cost-efficiently provide transportation to its pupils who it is responsible for transporting to school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 461, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 462, § 1.

16-21-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

This section (G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 311/2; P.L. 1937, ch. 2506, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-2

; P.L. 1971, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 187, § 1), which was declared unconstitutional by the federal district court, Members of Jamestown School Comm. v. Schmidt, 427 F. Supp. 1338 (D.R.I. 1977), is considered repealed by §

16-21.1-6

. For present provisions, see §§

16-21.1-1

—

16-21.1-5

.

16-21-3.
Standards for school building.

The state building codes standards committee, the state fire marshal, the state health department, and the department of labor and training — division of occupational health and safety shall determine whether the school buildings in the several cities and towns or on state property conform to appropriate state law and regulation. Further, it shall be the responsibility of each local fire chief, local building inspector, the director of the state department of health, and the director of the state department of labor and training to determine and notify each local school superintendent or private school official by August 1 of each year as to whether the public and private nursery and elementary and secondary school buildings conform to appropriate state law and regulation. In the case of those schools on state property, it shall be the responsibility of the state building commissioner, the state fire marshal, the director of the department of health, and the department of labor and training to notify the department director responsible for the operation of the school as to whether these schools conform to appropriate state law and regulation.

The state building code standards committee shall establish building code standards necessary for the implementation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 725, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 78, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-3

; P.L. 1986, ch. 337, §§ 2, 3.

16-21-3.1.
Approval.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent of schools, private school official, or in the case of state operated schools, the responsibility of the director of the state operated school, to ensure that schools are not opened until notification is received from the aforementioned agencies that the schools are in compliance with their respective codes.

Neglect by any superintendent, private school official, or the director of any state operated school to comply with the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 337, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 4, effective July 14, 2021.

16-21-4.
Fire, evacuation and lockdown drills required — Failure to comply.

It shall be the duty of the principal or other person in charge of every public school or private school, college, university, or postsecondary institutions or educational institution within the state, having more than twenty-five (25) pupils, to instruct and train the pupils by means of drills, so that they may in a sudden emergency be able to leave school buildings and dormitories in the shortest possible time and without confusion or panic.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, in all schools or buildings used for educational purposes through the twelfth grade by six (6) or more persons for four (4) or more hours per day or more than twelve (12) hours per week, there shall be not less than one emergency egress drill conducted every month the facility is in session with all occupants of the building participating in said drill. One additional emergency egress drill shall be conducted in buildings that are not open on a year-round basis within the first (1st) thirty (30) days of operation. At least one out of every four (4) emergency egress drills or rapid dismissals shall be obstructed by means of which at least one or more exits and stairways in the school building are blocked off or not used. In addition, there shall be two (2) evacuation drills and two (2) lockdown drills. Evacuation drills shall be designed and conducted for use when conditions outside the school building are safer than conditions inside the building. Lockdown drills shall be designed and conducted for use to protect school building occupants from potential dangers in the building, and one shall be held in September and one in January, and in conjunction with the local police whenever possible.

In colleges, universities, postsecondary institutions, and residence facilities in public schools or private schools there shall be at least four (4) drills or rapid dismissals during the academic year for each school building or residence facility, at least two (2) of which shall be held between the months of September through December. The remaining two (2) drills shall be held between the months of January through June. Any college, university, or postsecondary institution that holds a summer session shall hold a drill or rapid dismissal during the first full week of the summer session.

At least one drill or rapid dismissal shall be obstructed so that at least one or more exits or stairways in the school building or dormitory are blocked off or not used.

For purposes of this section “residence facility” means dormitory, fraternity, sorority, or any other type of residence hall, whether on campus or off campus, owned or leased by a college, university, postsecondary institutions, public schools, or private school with accommodations for twenty (20) or more students.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, fire drills shall be required in colleges or universities only for buildings which are used for a residence facility.

Neglect by any principal or any person in charge of any public or private school or educational institution to comply with the provisions of this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

Written reports, on forms supplied by the department of elementary and secondary education, of each fire drill shall be completed immediately upon termination of every drill and shall be available for review by the fire marshal, assistant deputy fire marshal, or local fire authority. The fire marshal, assistant deputy fire marshal, or local fire authority may require that a fire drill be conducted in his or her presence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 68, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1912, ch. 797, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, §§ 9, 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, §§ 9, 10; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-4

; P.L. 1959, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 439, § 1.

16-21-5.
Uniform fire code or drill tactics — Reports.

It shall be the duty of the department of elementary and secondary education or the office of higher education, as appropriate, to formulate a uniform fire code or drill tactics to be used in all schools in accordance with §

16-21-4

and to furnish a sufficient number of copies for use in all schools together with forms for reporting to the fire department of the city or town in which the schools are located and to the department or office. These forms shall be furnished by the department or office to all schools and shall be substantially as follows:

In the case of colleges, universities, and postsecondary institutions, these reports shall remain on the premises available for review by fire officials.

State of Rhode Island Name of school Principal or person in charge day of time alarm a.m. Date drill is held week sounded p.m. Time taken to empty building
minutes seconds Total time elapsed before school work is resumed minutes seconds check type of drill one obstructed unobstructed Signal used Number of fire alarm button or station used Name of person sounding alarm Weather conditions Temperature Remarks

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 11; P.L. 1912, ch. 797, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-5

; P.L. 1959, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 215, § 1.

16-21-5.1.
Carbon monoxide detectors required in school buildings.

Effective January 1, 2019, all school buildings where students are in attendance for any portion of the day shall be required to have carbon monoxide detectors installed and maintained therein, in accordance with the applicable provisions of the National Fire Protection Association (“NFPA”) Code and the state fire safety code (“state code”), chapter 28.1 of title 23. The fire safety code board of appeal and review (the “board”) established pursuant to chapter 28.3 of title 23 shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to enforce the provisions of this section. Provided, in the event the state fire marshal determines that neither the NFPA code nor the state code have provisions in place to govern the installation, then the state fire marshal may use the provisions of NFPA Code 1/NFPA 101, 2015 editions, NFPA Code 720, 2012 edition, the state fire code, and any additional requirements provided under those codes for licensed nursery or daycare services, as guidance in the installation of carbon monoxide detectors in schools, until such time as the board promulgates applicable rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 202, § 1.

16-21-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 12; P.L. 1912, ch. 797, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1978, ch. 215, § 1.

16-21-7.
School health.

All schools that are approved for the purpose of §§

16-19-1

and

16-19-2

shall have a school health program that shall be approved by the state director of the department of health and the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the commissioner of higher education, as appropriate. The program shall provide for the organized direction and supervision of a healthful school environment, health education, and services. The program shall include and provide for the administration of nursing care by certified nurse teachers, as defined in §

16-21-8

, as shall be requested, in writing, by the attending physician of any student and authorized, in writing, by the parent or legal guardian of the student. No instruction in the characteristics, symptoms, and the treatment of disease shall be given to any child whose parent or guardian shall present a written statement signed by them stating that the instructions should not be given the child because of religious beliefs.

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 529, § 1.]

All Rhode Island elementary, middle, and high schools that sell or distribute competitive foods and beverages on the school campus during the school day shall be required to offer only healthy foods and beverages as set forth by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Healthy, Hunger-Free Kids Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-296, 42 U.S.C. § 1758 et seq., and federal regulations implementing the act promulgated pursuant to the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 1779(b). Provided, the Rhode Island board of education or local school committees may adopt more restrictive policies than the ones referenced herein.

Schools may permit the sale of beverages and snacks that do not comply with subsection (c) as part of school fundraising in any of the following circumstances:

The sale of those items takes place off and away from the school campus.

The sale of those items takes place after the end of the school day as defined in subsection (g).

Career and technical schools with culinary arts or food-service programs may request an exemption from the department of elementary and secondary education to enable the limited sale of noncompliant snacks and beverages that have been prepared by culinary students as part of their curriculum. No specially exempted fundraiser foods or beverages may be sold in competition with school meals during the meal service.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall post on its website resources to assist school districts with implementation of this section.

The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop a process to monitor compliance with this section.

Definitions. As used in this section:

“Competitive foods” means all foods and beverages, other than meals reimbursed under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.) and the Child Nutrition Act of 1966 (42 U.S.C. § 1771 et seq.), available for sale to students on the school campus during the school day.

“School campus” means all areas of the property under the jurisdiction of the school that are accessible to students during the school day.

“School day” means the period from midnight before, to sixty (60) minutes after, the end of the official school day.

The standards set forth and referenced in this section shall apply throughout the entire school campus, including, but not limited to, a la carte food sale, school stores, vending machines, and fundraisers held during the school day.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 10; P.L. 1949, ch. 2341, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-7

; P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 2; P.L. 1977, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 234, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 92, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 529, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 351, § 3, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 352, § 3, effective July 12, 2021.

16-21-7.1.
Unhealthy food and beverage advertising prohibited in schools.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a school district shall prohibit at any school within the district:

The advertising of any food or beverage that may not be sold on the school campus during the school day. For purposes of this section, food and beverages that may not be sold on the school campus during the school day are those that do not meet the minimum nutrition standards as set forth by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Healthy, Hunger-Free Kids Act of 2010 (Pub. L. No. 111-296) federal regulations implementing the Act [42 U.S.C. § 1779(b)], and as set forth by the Rhode Island board of education and local school committees. Advertising is prohibited on any property or facility owned or leased by the school district or school and used at any time for school-related activities, including, but not limited to, school buildings, athletic fields, facilities, signs, scoreboards, parking lots, school buses or other vehicles, equipment, vending machines, uniforms, educational materials, or supplies; and

The participation in a corporate incentive program that rewards children with free or discounted foods or beverages that may not be sold on the school campus during the school day when they reach certain academic goals.

Exceptions. The restriction on advertising in subsection (a) shall not apply to:

Advertising on broadcast, digital, or print media, unless the media are produced or controlled by the local education agency, school, faculty, or its students;

Advertising on clothing with brand images worn on school grounds;

Advertising contained on product packaging; or

Advertising on a food truck that sells foods and beverages on school property, after the end of the school day, as defined in §

16-21-7

.

Implementation. The restriction on advertising in subsection (a) shall take effect on September 1, 2018, with the following limited exceptions:

For advertising that occurs pursuant to a contract or lease, the restrictions in subsection (a) apply to advertising that occurs pursuant to a contract or lease that was entered into or renewed on or after the effective date [June 4, 2018] of this section; and

Nothing in this section requires the removal, from a permanent fixture, of advertising that does not comply with the restrictions in subsection (a), until the permanent fixture is removed or replaced, provided the advertising or display is a permanent feature of the permanent fixture.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Advertising” means an oral, written, or graphic statement or representation, including a company logo or trademark, made for the purpose of promoting the use or sale of a product by its producer, manufacturer, distributer, seller, or any other entity with a commercial interest in the product.

“Brand” means a corporate or product name, a business image, or a mark, regardless of whether it legally qualifies as a trademark used by a seller or manufacturer to identify their goods or services and to distinguish them from competitors’ goods.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 22, § 1.

16-21-8.
Certified nurse-teacher.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, each school system shall employ certified nurse-teacher personnel certified by the state department of elementary and secondary education; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to those school districts that are currently allowed to share certified nurse-teacher personnel by the department of elementary and secondary education. The school health program as defined in §

16-21-7

shall only be staffed by certified nurse-teacher personnel.

Any person who, as of August 1, 2021, is employed in a Rhode Island school district pursuant to an all grades registered school nurse certificate, but who does not meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, shall be deemed grandfathered into that school district and may continue to be employed pursuant to that all grades registered school nurse certificate within that same school district. If a person so employed seeks employment in another Rhode Island school district as a school nurse-teacher after August 1, 2021, that person shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

Each elementary or secondary school with a school-based health center on site shall employ or have on staff certified nurse-teacher personnel certified by the state department of elementary and secondary education to be on site and/or available for consultation, at a minimum, during the school-based health center hours of operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 218, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 219, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 351, § 3, effective July 12, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 352, § 3, effective July 12, 2021.

16-21-9.
Health examinations and dental screenings — Reports — Records.

Each community as defined in §

16-7-16

shall provide for the appointment of a physician to make examinations of the health of the school children, who shall report any deviation from the normal, and for the preservation of records of the examinations of the children. Each community shall further provide for dental screenings by a licensed dentist or licensed dental hygienist or a licensed public health dental hygienist, with at least three (3) years of clinical experience, who shall report any suspected deviation from the normal, and for the preservation of records of the screenings of the children. Each community shall notify the parents or custodians of children of conditions requiring professional or skilled treatment. The state commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall provide blank forms and record books that he or she may deem necessary for the purposes of this section.

Each community as defined in §

16-7-16

shall contract with a licensed dentist and/or a licensed public health dental hygienist, for the provision of the dental screenings services required by this section. Dental hygienists performing the dental screenings pursuant to the provisions of this section shall do so under the general supervision of the dentist liable and responsible under the contract with the community or within the collaborative agreement guidelines between a licensed public health hygienist and licensed dentist.

Except in emergency circumstances, should a referral by a dentist, dental hygienist, and/or public health dental hygienist of children screened pursuant to the provisions of this section be provided to a dental practice by which the dentist or dental hygienist is employed and/or which the dentist owns, the referral should include the name(s) of one or more dental practices as alternative providers. In the event that a referral has been made in violation of this provision, the community shall terminate its contract with the dentist. In the case of an egregious violation of the referral prohibition contained in this section, that conduct shall be reported to the board of dental examiners.

Each community shall provide to parents or custodians of children who require professional or skilled treatment a list of both dental practices in the community that accept patients insured by medical assistance and/or RIte Care and dental practices that provide services on a sliding scale basis to uninsured individuals. The department of human services shall provide each community with a list containing the addresses and telephone numbers of both dental practices that accept patients insured by medical assistance and/or RIte Care and dental practices that provide services on a sliding scale basis to uninsured individuals.

Dental screenings for children in kindergarten, third, and ninth grade shall only be performed by a licensed dentist or licensed public health dental hygienist.

All dentists, dental hygienists, and/or public health dental hygienists, performing dental screenings pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall meet with the oral health director of the department of health on a regular basis, as determined by the chief.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 725, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 78, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-9

; P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 172, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 192, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 138, § 1.

16-21-10.
Scoliosis screening.

The school health program shall provide for the yearly screening or examination for scoliosis of all school children in grades six (6) through eight (8) and the preservation of records of the screening or examinations of those children. The parent or guardian of any child in grades six (6) through eight (8) may have the screening or examination conducted by a private physician and the results shall be made available to the local school department. Otherwise, the screening shall be conducted by a certified nurse-teacher. The screening of male and female pupils shall be conducted separately. The parent or guardian of any child who is found to have positive signs or symptoms of scoliosis shall be notified of the findings. However, the test shall not be required of any student whose parents or guardian objects on the ground that the test conflicts with their religious belief.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 19, § 1.

16-21-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2103, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-10

; Repealed by P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 5.

16-21-12.
Dental treatment provided by town or city.

The school committee may provide at the expense of the town or city proper dental treatment for children, found to be suffering from dental defects or conditions arising from dental defects, whose parents or guardians or custodians neglect to provide proper dental treatment within one month after receiving a notice of the need as required by §

16-21-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1484, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 78, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-12

; P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 2.

16-21-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 816, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 78, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 182, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-21-13

; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 14, effective August 9, 1996.

16-21-14.
Hearing, speech, and vision screenings — Records — Statewide hearing screening program.

The program shall provide for screenings of the hearing, speech, and vision of all children in these schools, and the preservation of records of the screenings of the children and notification of the parent or guardian of any child where there is an identified or suspected special health care need.

Upon initial entry, all school children shall be given a hearing screening test by a properly trained professional employed by the department of elementary and secondary education, at intervals consistent with regulations promulgated by the director of health and the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Pupils who failed the hearing screening test in previous years, repeat a grade, have a history of hearing difficulty or pathology, or are suspected by school personnel of a hearing loss shall be screened as often as is necessary.

The program shall be known as the statewide hearing screening program. It shall be operated by the department of elementary and secondary education.

The department is authorized and directed to maintain the program and provide equipment that may be necessary to implement the purposes of this section.

Upon request from a local education agency the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may grant the local education agency permission to conduct its own hearing screening program after he or she first determines that the agency has a capacity to adhere to the screening schedule as outlined in this section and that properly trained professionals defined in regulation will be performing the activities.

Tests shall not be required of any student whose parent or guardian objects on the ground that the tests conflict with their religious beliefs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 3; P.L. 1962, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 50; P.L. 2000, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 242, § 1.

16-21-14.1.
Vision screening.

Upon entering kindergarten or within thirty (30) days of the start of the school year, the parent or guardian of each child shall present to school health personnel certification that the child, within the previous twelve (12) months has passed a vision screening conducted by a health care professional licensed by the department of health or has obtained a comprehensive eye examination performed by a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist. For children who fail to pass the vision screening and for children diagnosed with neurodevelopmental delay, proof of a comprehensive eye examination performed by a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist indicating any pertinent diagnosis, treatment, prognosis, recommendation and evidence of follow-up treatment, if necessary, shall be provided.

Any person who conducts a comprehensive eye examination of a child in response to such child having failed a vision screening given in accordance with the provisions of this section shall forward a written report of the results of the examination to the school health personnel and a copy of said report to a parent or guardian of such child and the child’s primary health care provider. Said report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Date of report;

Name, address and date of birth of the child;

Name of the child’s school;

Type of examination;

A summary of significant findings, including diagnoses, medication used, duration of action of medication, treatment, prognosis, whether or not a return visit is recommended and, if so, when;

Recommended educational adjustments for the child, if any, which may include the following: preferential seating in the classroom, eyeglasses for full-time use in school, eyeglasses for part-time use in school, sight-saving eyeglasses or any other recommendations;

Name, address and signature of the examiner.

The department of health in consultation with the department of education shall promulgate regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including the regular reporting to the departments of health and education on the results of examinations provided under subsection (b) above.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall provide a comprehensive report on the education of blind and visually impaired children to the general assembly prior to March 1, 2009. The report shall include, but not limited to, an overview of policies and programs; an analysis of the effect that vision exam reports have had on improving education for children; and the comprehensive statewide vision education and services program; and recommendations. The commissioner shall provide an update of said analysis and report to the general assembly prior to March 1, 2012 and every three (3) years thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 31.

16-21-15.
Eye protective devices.

Every student and teacher in a public or private school, college, or university participating in any of the courses listed in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection shall be required to wear approved eye protective devices at all times while participating in the courses or laboratories. The devices shall be furnished by their respective schools, colleges, and universities to all students, teachers, and visitors to the following classrooms and laboratories:

Vocational or industrial arts shops or laboratories involving experience with:

Hot molten metals;

Milling, sawing, turning, shaping, cutting, grinding, or stamping of any solid materials;

Heat treatment, tempering, or kiln firing of any metal or other materials;

Gas or electric arc welding;

Repair or servicing of any vehicle;

Caustic or explosive materials;

Chemical or combined chemical-physical laboratories involving caustic or explosive chemicals or hot liquids or solids.

The director of labor and training shall promulgate regulations and standards assuring the use of devices which will protect the eyes of teachers, pupils, and visitors against injury from foreign substances, and each public or private school, college, and university shall, before furnishing eye protective devices, obtain approval of the devices from the director of labor and training.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 185, § 1.

16-21-16.
Students suspected of narcotic addiction.

Any teacher having reasonable cause to suspect that a secondary or elementary student under eighteen (18) years of age is addicted to a narcotic drug or under the influence of a dangerous drug who reports this information to the appropriate secondary or elementary school officials pursuant to the school’s drug policy, or if the school has no drug policy to the school’s principal or the parents of the student under eighteen (18) years of age, shall have immunity from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of the making of the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 306, § 1.

16-21-17.
School bus safety programs.

Every school department shall provide school bus safety instructions for all children in grades kindergarten through six (6). The instruction shall take place at least four (4) times per year, two (2) of which shall take place during the months of September and October.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 366, § 1.

16-21-18.
Students prohibited from bringing or possessing firearms on school premises.

The school penalty for bringing or possessing a weapon as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 921, a firearm or realistic replica of a firearm within school premises, premises being used for school purposes or activities, into a vehicle used for school transportation, or onto a roadway or path along which school children or teachers are walking to school shall be suspension from school for one year. This penalty will also be incurred when a student is not on school premises but when he or she aims a firearm or realistic replica of a firearm at school premises, school vehicles, or students, staff, or visitors attending school or in transit to or from school. This term of suspension may be shortened by the superintendent of schools on a case-by-case basis and under guidelines to be developed by the school committee with broad parent, teacher, and community involvement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 1.

16-21-19.
Special rules for students with disabilities bringing firearms to school.

Students with disabilities as defined by the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1415, shall be subject to the provisions of §

16-21-18

to the extent permitted by the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1415.

Students with disabilities as defined by Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, shall be subject to the provisions of §

16-21-18

to the extent permitted by Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 1.

16-21-20.
Alternative placement and prevention activities.

The department of elementary and secondary education in conjunction with the attorney general’s task force to prevent violence in schools shall develop requirements for the alternative placement of students suspended under the provision of §

16-21-18

. The placements shall be cooperative efforts between the local school district, which shall be responsible for instruction of students, and other appropriate state and local agencies. Further, the department of elementary and secondary education in conjunction with the attorney general’s task force shall establish policies in support of locally developed prevention and education activities that include broad parent, teacher, and community involvement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 1.